Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.780

Manufacturing—Independent assessment and industrial strategy.

(1) The department of commerce must perform an independent assessment of opportunities for Washington to capture new and emerging industries that align with statewide greenhouse gas reduction limits and strengthen its existing manufacturing base. By October 1, 2024, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of commerce shall submit the independent assessment to the appropriate committees of the legislature, and shall submit the assessment to the state manufacturing council established in RCW 43.330.762.

(2) By June 1, 2025, the department of commerce must develop a proactive state industrial strategy that seeks to strengthen and transform Washington's existing manufacturing base and capture new and emerging industries. The strategy should be informed by the independent assessment required by subsection (1) of this section. The manufacturing council convened pursuant to RCW 43.330.762 shall advise and consult on the development of the strategy.

(3) The independent assessment must include, but is not limited to:

(a) Assessing how the transition to net-zero emissions by 2050 will impact the potential futures of manufacturing in Washington, including identifying specific opportunities for Washington to actively seek investment in new and emerging industries and to transform and strengthen the state's existing manufacturing base to meet the needs of a net-zero economy, taking into account the Washington's existing key sectors, job quality, and regional diversity;

(b) Assessing the needs of Washington's existing manufacturers, including supply chain challenges and resources required to meet the statutory greenhouse gas emissions reductions in RCW 70A.45.020;

(c) Identifying opportunities to build and maximize the environmental and economic benefits of a circular economy for both new and existing industries in building out and strengthening Washington's manufacturing base;

(d) Identifying what is required to attract new private investment and transform and strengthen Washington's existing manufacturing base, including needs related to:

(i) Transportation and port infrastructure;

(ii) Supply chains;

(iii) Workforce; and

(iv) Energy;

(e) Identifying opportunities to support minority and women-owned firms and small and medium-sized firms in capturing new and emerging industries;

(f) Identifying existing and potential future gaps in the state's manufacturing sector that inhibit in-state manufacturers from producing the necessary goods, services, and infrastructure to transition to the net-zero economy and attract new investment in the state to accelerate the in-state production of clean energy product manufacturing; and

(g) Evaluating opportunities for the state's use of public ownership investment in developed and emerging manufacturing industries to address the existing and potential future gaps identified in (f) of this subsection. This evaluation shall provide recommendations on the highest and best uses of public resources as part of the state industrial strategy as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The workforce assessment referenced in subsection (3)(d)(iii) of this section should: (a) Catalogue and examine how to maximize the use of the existing manufacturing workforce's transferable skills; (b) address any remaining skills gaps and identify opportunities to build a manufacturing workforce pipeline that ensures all current and future Washingtonians have fair access to a manufacturing career by sector; and (c) ensure equitable and accessible pathways and advancement opportunities in manufacturing by sector.

(5) The energy assessment referenced in subsection (3)(d)(iv) of this section should include the quantity, price, and location of electricity necessary to decarbonize and grow Washington's existing manufacturing base and capture new and emerging industries.

(6) The independent assessment will not replace but may inform the work of the manufacturing council created in RCW 43.330.762 to advise and consult on the department of commerce's recommendations to achieve the goals established in RCW 43.330.760.

[ 2023 c 322 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 322: "This act may be known and cited as the Washington clean manufacturing leadership act." [ 2023 c 322 s 4.]